Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1342
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that our society is increasingly dependent on computers, that important personal, financial, medical, and historical data is stored in computers, and that valuable data stored can be lost due to criminal action.

The Legislature further finds that specific criminal statutes are necessary to cover the actions of persons who intentionally destroy data or commit fraud using computers.

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 3.